North Dakota, session 69, SB2167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 29-26 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Cost of digital forensic examination.
An individual convicted of a felony or misdemeanor shall, as part of the sentence imposed by the
court, pay for the reimbursement of the cost of any digital forensic examination performed on any
personal electronic device in the investigation and prosecution of the crime for which the defendant is
convicted. The fee assessed may not exceed one hundred dollars for each defendant. All fees collected
under this section must be remitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the internet crimes investigation
fund established in section 2 of this Act. For purposes of this section, the term "personal electronic
device" means any portable electronic device designed for and capable of wireless communication or
electronic data retrieval, including a cellular telephone, tablet, laptop, computer, or two-way messaging
device.
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 54-12 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Internet crimes investigation fund - Continuing appropriation.
The internet crimes investigation fund is a special fund established in the state treasury. The fund
consists of all fees imposed pursuant to section 1 of this Act, which are appropriated to the attorney
general on a continuing basis for information technology hardware, software licensing, digital forensic
training, and internet safety presentations to assist law enforcement entities and organizations
dedicated to preventing technology - facilitated child sexual exploitation and internet crimes agains t
children. Interest earned on moneys in the fund must be credited to the fund.

S. B. NO. 2167 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2167.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 0 Absent 6
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State